test/src/morphology/N-usk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - usk: # Noun 77 'eng /est usk/fin' - full paradigm
     usk+N+Sg+Nom: usk
     usk+N+Sg+Gen: usk
     usk+N+Sg+Par: uskõ
     usk+N+Sg+Dat: uskõn
     usk+N+Sg+Ins: uskõks
     usk+N+Sg+Ill: uskõ
     usk+N+Sg+Ela: uskstõ
     usk+N+Pl+Nom: uskūd
     usk+N+Pl+Gen: uskūd
     usk+N+Pl+Par: uskīdi
     usk+N+Pl+Dat: uskūdõn
     usk+N+Pl+Ins: uskūdõks
     usk+N+Pl+Ill: uskīž
     usk+N+Pl+Ela: uskīst
